Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2632.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 10, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1317.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1317.01. Tenant use of marijuana; rental agreement; termination prohibited A landlord may not terminate a tenant's rental agreement because the tenant uses marijuana. END_STATUTE